da: Krogens udformning: Dobbelt trekrog; Flere inline-kroge; Ingen kroge; Enkelt inline-krog; Enkelt trekrog; Tredobbelt trekrog; Andet
pt-BR: Anzol configuração: Garateias duplas; Vários anzóis inline; Sem anzóis; Anzol inline simples; Garateia simples; Garateias triplas; Outros
es: Configuración del anzuelo: Anzuelos triples dobles; Múltiples anzuelos en línea; Sin anzuelos; Un anzuelo en línea; Un anzuelo triple; Tres anzuelos triples; Otro
en: Hook configuration: Double treble hooks; Multiple inline hooks; No hooks; Single inline hook; Single treble hook; Triple treble hooks; Other
hu: Horog konfigurációja: Kettős hármashorgok; Többszörös soros horgok; Horgok nélkül; Egyszeres soros horog; Egyszeres hármashorog; Hármas hármashorgok; Egyéb
fi: Koukkukokoonpano: Kaksi kolmihaarakoukkua; Useita inline-koukkuja; Ei koukkuja; Yksi inline-koukku; Yksi kolmihaarakoukku; Kolme kolmihaarakoukkua; Muu
bg-BG: Конфигурация на куката: Двойни тройни куки; Множество инлайн куки; Без куки; Единична инлайн кука; Единична тройна кука; Тройни тройни куки; Друго
zh-TW: 鉤子配置: 雙三本鉤; 多個直柄鉤; 無鉤; 單一直柄鉤; 單一三本鉤; 三個三本鉤; 其他
th: การกำหนดค่าตะขอ: ตัวเบ็ดสามทางคู่; ตัวเบ็ดทางเดียวหลายตัว; ไม่มีตัวเบ็ด; ตัวเบ็ดทางเดียว; ตัวเบ็ดสามทางเดี่ยว; ตัวเบ็ดสามทางสามตัว; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Konfigurácia háčikov: Dvojité trojháčiky; Viacero inline háčikov; Bez háčikov; Jeden inline háčik; Jeden trojháčik; Trojité trojháčiky; Iné
tr: Kanca yapılandırması: Çift üçlü iğne; Çoklu sıralı iğne; İğnesiz; Tekli sıralı iğne; Tekli üçlü iğne; Üç adet üçlü iğne; Diğer
el: Διαμόρφωση στο αγκίστρι: Διπλές σαλαγκιές; Πολλαπλά αγκίστρια inline; Χωρίς αγκίστρια; Μονό αγκίστρι inline; Μονή σαλαγκιά; Τριπλές σαλαγκιές; Άλλο
vi: Cấu hình móc: Hai lưỡi câu ba tiêu; Nhiều lưỡi câu nối tiếp; Không có lưỡi câu; Lưỡi câu nối tiếp đơn; Một lưỡi câu ba tiêu; Ba lưỡi câu ba tiêu; Khác
pt-PT: Configuração do gancho: Anzóis triplos duplos; Vários anzóis em linha; Sem anzóis; Anzol em linha simples; Anzol triplo simples; Anzóis triplos triplos; Outro
sv: Krokkonfiguration: Dubbla trekrokar; Flera enkelkrokar (inline); Inga krokar; Enkelkrok (inline); Enkel trekrok; Tre trekrokar; Annat
ru: Конфигурация крючков: Два тройных крючка; Несколько одинарных крючков; Без крючков; Один одинарный крючок; Один тройной крючок; Три тройных крючка; Другое
nb: Krokkonfigurasjon: Doble treblekroker; Flere inline-kroker; Uten kroker; Enkel inline-krok; Enkel treblekrok; Tre treblekroker; Annet
lt-LT: Kabliuko konfigūracija: Dvigubi trišakiai kabliukai; Keli vienaeiliai kabliukai; Be kabliukų; Vienas vienaeilis kabliukas; Vienas trišakis kabliukas; Trigubi trišakiai kabliukai; Kita
zh-CN: 鱼钩配置: 双三本钩; 多个直柄单钩; 无钩; 单个直柄单钩; 单三本钩; 三个三本钩; 其他
de: Hakenkonfiguration: Doppel-Drillinge; Mehrere Inline-Haken; Keine Haken; Einzelner Inline-Haken; Einzelner Drilling; Dreifach-Drillinge; Andere
ro-RO: Configurația cârligului: Cârlige triple duble; Mai multe cârlige în linie; Fără cârlige; Un singur cârlig în linie; O singură ancoră; Trei ancore; Altele
fr: Configuration des crochets: Hameçons triples doubles; Hameçons multiples en ligne; Sans hameçons; Hameçon simple en ligne; Hameçon triple simple; Hameçons triples triples; Autre
ko: 후크 구성: 더블 트레블 훅; 다중 인라인 훅; 훅 없음; 싱글 인라인 훅; 싱글 트레블 훅; 트리플 트레블 훅; 기타
it: Configurazione degli ami: Doppie ancorette; Ami multipli in linea; Senza ami; Amo singolo in linea; Ancoretta singola; Triple ancorette; Altro
nl: Haak configuratie: Dubbele dreggen; Meerdere inlinehaken; Geen haken; Enkele inlinehaak; Enkele dreg; Drievoudige dreggen; Overig
hr-HR: Konfiguracija kuke: Dvostruke trokuke; Višestruke inline udice; Bez udica; Jednostruka inline udica; Jednostruka trokuka; Trostruke trokuke; Ostalo
ja: フック構成: ダブルトレブルフック; 複数のインラインフック; フックなし; シングルインラインフック; シングルトレブルフック; トリプルトレブルフック; その他
pl: Konfiguracja haczyków: Dwie kotwiczki; Wiele haczyków inline; Brak haczyków; Pojedynczy haczyk inline; Pojedyncza kotwiczka; Trzy kotwiczki; Inna
cs: Konfigurace háku: Dvojité trojháčky; Více jednoháčků (inline); Bez háčků; Jeden jednoháček (inline); Jeden trojháček; Tři trojháčky; Jiné
sl-SI: Konfiguracija trnka: Dva trojčka; Več inline trnkov; Brez trnkov; Enojni inline trnek; Enojni trojček; Trije trojčki; Drugo